District of Columbia statutes.
47-210

Items included in annual estimates — Certain expenses incurred in claims against District.

The estimates for expenses incurred on account of the District of Columbia in the examination of witnesses and procuring of evidence in the matter of claims against the District of Columbia pending in any department shall be submitted in the annual estimates for the District of Columbia.

History

Aug. 4, 1886, 24 Stat. 252, ch. 902, § 1
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-210.
1973 Ed., § 47-208.